Utah statutes.
63M-7-503.   Restitution -- Reparations not to supplant restitution -- Assignment of claim for restitution judgment to Reparations Office.

(1)  A reparations award may not supplant restitution as established under Title 77, Chapter 38a, Crime Victims Restitution Act, or as established by any other provisions.

(2)  The court may not reduce an order of restitution based on a reparations award.

(3)  If, due to reparation payments to a victim, the Office of Crime Victim Reparations is assigned under Section 63M-7-519 a claim for the victim's judgment for restitution or a portion of the restitution, the office may file with the sentencing court a notice of the assignment.  The notice of assignment shall be signed by the victim and a reparations officer and shall state the amount of the claim assigned.

(4)  Upon conviction and sentencing of the defendant, the court shall enter a civil judgment for complete restitution as provided in Section 77-38a-401 and identify the office as the assignee of the assigned portion of the judgment.

(5)  If the notice of assignment is filed after sentencing, the court shall modify the civil judgment for restitution to identify the office as the assignee of the assigned portion of the judgment.

